Illinois, session 104th, SB3618.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 5Treatment Act is amended by adding Section 10-2 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 70/10-2 new)7    Sec. 10-2. Sexual assault services for minors at child 8advocacy centers.9    (a) A minor who is present at a child advocacy center in 10the State following the disclosure or the suspicion of sexual 11assault shall be eligible to receive a sexual assault services 12voucher, regardless of the minor's insurance status.13    (b) A sexual assault services voucher for a minor at a 14child advocacy center may be used for:15        (1) transportation to a treatment hospital;16        (2) meals and basic nourishment for the minor or 17    non-offending caregiver during appointments or follow-up 18    care; or19        (3) child care or dependent care for siblings or other 20    dependents when necessary to attend child advocacy center 21    or therapy appointments.22    (c) A sexual assault services voucher issued under this 23Section shall supplement other sexual assault services   SB3618- 2 -LRB104 19035 TRT 32480 b1vouchers authorized under this Act and may be combined for 2eligible minors.3    (d) The Department of Children and Family Services, in 4consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall 5adopt rules to implement this Section, including guidelines 6for issuance, reimbursement, and reporting.7    (e) Each child advocacy center that issues sexual assault 8services vouchers shall submit an annual report to Department 9of Children and Family Services, which includes:10        (1) the number of vouchers issued;11        (2) the types of services used;12        (3) the number of minors completing follow-up mental 13    health services; and14        (4) the barriers addressed by the program. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 161, 2027.